fi: Autogiron ohjaamon kate: Suljettu; Avoin; Puolisuljettu; Muu
lt-LT: Autogiro kabinos gaubtas: Uždara; Atvira; Pusiau uždara; Kita
sv: Autogyrons cockpithölje: Täckt; Öppen; Halvtäckt; Annat
ru: Ограждение кабины автожира: Закрытая; Открытая; Полузакрытая; Другое
en: Autogyro cockpit enclosure: Enclosed; Open; Semi-enclosed; Other
bg-BG: Затворена конструкция на кабината на автожиро: Затворена; Отворена; Полуотворена; Друго
da: Kabineafskærmning til autogyro: Lukket; Åbent; Halvlukket; Andet
tr: Otojiro kokpit muhafazası: Kapalı; Açık; Yarı kapalı; Diğer
zh-CN: 自转旋翼机驾驶舱封闭情况: 封闭式; 开放式; 半封闭式; 其他
ko: 오토자이로 조종석 덮개: 밀폐형; 개방형; 반밀폐형; 기타
sl-SI: Ohišje kabine avtožira: Zaprto; Odprto; Polzaprto; Drugo
pl: Typ zabudowy kokpitu wiatrakowca: Zamknięta; Otwarta; Półzamknięta; Inna
zh-TW: 旋翼機駕駛艙罩: 封閉式; 開放式; 半封閉式; 其他
nl: Autogyro cockpitafsluiting: Gesloten; Open; Halfgesloten; Overige
pt-PT: Estrutura do cockpit do girocóptero: Fechado; Aberto; Semifechado; Outros
de: Cockpitverkleidung für Tragschrauber: Geschlossen; Offen; Halboffen; Sonstige
vi: Khoang lái máy bay trực thăng tự quay: Kín; Mở; Bán kín; Khác
th: รูปแบบห้องนักบินของออโตไจโร: แบบปิด; แบบเปิด; แบบกึ่งปิด; อื่นๆ
es: Cabina de autogiro: Cerrada; Abierta; Semicerrada; Otra
hu: Autogiro pilótafülkéjének burkolata: Zárt; Nyitott; Félig zárt; Egyéb
ro-RO: Carcasa cabinei girocopterului: Închis; Deschis; Semi-închis; Altele
cs: Provedení kokpitu vírníku: Uzavřený; Otevřený; Polouzavřený; Ostatní
it: Cabina di pilotaggio dell'autogiro: Chiuso; Aperto; Semichiuso; Altro
ja: オートジャイロのコックピット囲い: 密閉式; 開放式; 半密閉式; その他
hr-HR: Zatvorenost pilotske kabine žirokoptera: Zatvoreno; Otvoreno; Poluzatvoreno; Ostalo
nb: Autogyro cockpitkabinett: Lukket; Åpen; Halvåpen; Annet
el: Κάλυπτρο πιλοτηρίου αυτόγυρου: Κλειστό; Ανοιχτό; Ημίκλειστο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Kryt kokpitu vírnika: Uzavretý; Otvorený; Polouzavretý; Iné
pt-BR: Envólucro da cabine do autogiro: Fechado; Aberto; Semifechado; Outro
fr: Enceinte de cockpit d’autogire: Fermé; Ouvert; Semi-fermé; Autre